Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201379-8,137.04
Enhancing
Excellence in Teaching Program; contract requirements; loan payments; suspension;
loan forgiveness; amount.

(1) Prior to receiving
any money from a loan pursuant to the Enhancing Excellence in Teaching Program,
an eligible student shall enter into a contract with the department. Such contract shall provide notice to
the eligible student that funding for loans pursuant to the Enhancing Excellence
in Teaching Program terminates on June 30, 2016. Such contract
shall be exempt from the requirements of sections 73-501 to 73-510. The contract
shall require that if (a) the borrower is not employed as a full-time teacher
teaching in an approved or accredited school in Nebraska for a time period
equal to the number of years required for loan forgiveness pursuant to subsection
(2) of this section or (b) the borrower does not complete the requirements
for graduation within five consecutive years after receiving the initial loan
under the program, then the loan shall be repaid, with interest at the rate
fixed pursuant to section 45-103 accruing as of the date the borrower signed
the contract and actual collection costs as determined by the department.
If a borrower fails to remain enrolled at an eligible institution or otherwise
fails to meet the requirements of an eligible student, repayment of the loan
shall commence within six months after such change in eligibility. The State
Board of Education may by rules and regulations provide for exceptions to
the conditions of repayment pursuant to this subsection based upon mitigating
circumstances.

(2) If the borrower (a) successfully completes the eligible
graduate program and major for which the borrower is receiving a forgivable
loan pursuant to the Enhancing Excellence in Teaching Program and maintains
certification pursuant to sections 79-806 to 79-815, (b) maintains employment
as a teacher in an approved or accredited school in this state, and (c) otherwise
meets the requirements of the contract, payments shall be suspended for the
number of years that the borrower is required to remain employed as a teacher
in this state under the contract. Beginning after the first two years of teaching
full-time in Nebraska following graduation for the degree for which the loan
was received, for each year that the borrower teaches full-time in Nebraska
pursuant to the contract, the loan shall be forgiven in an amount equal to
three thousand dollars, except that if the borrower teaches full-time in a
school district that is in a local system classified as very sparse as defined
in section 79-1003, teaches in a school building in which at least forty percent
of the students are poverty students as defined in section 79-1003, or teaches
in an accredited or approved private school in Nebraska in which at least
forty percent of the enrolled students qualified for free lunches as determined
by the most recent data available from the department, payments shall be forgiven
each year in an amount equal to six thousand dollars.

Laws 2009, LB547, § 11;

Laws 2010, LB1071, § 11;

Laws 2012, LB858, § 15;

Laws 2013, LB497, § 5.
May 30, 2013